Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"City" means an incorporated city or town.

"Department" means an administrative unit of a district court established for the orderly and efficient administration of business and may include, without being limited in scope thereby, a unit or units for determining traffic cases, violations of city ordinances, violations of state law, criminal cases, civil cases, or jury cases.

[ 2008 c 13 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 3; 1979 c 151 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 42 s 1; 1961 c 299 s 1.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—1984 c 258: "(1) Sections 1 through 210, 511, 601 through 808, and 901 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1984.

(2) Sections 501 through 510 and 512 through 524 of this act shall take effect on January 1, 1985.

(3) Sections 301 through 405 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1985." [ 1984 c 258 s 902.]

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Severability—1984 c 258: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 258 s 903.]

Short title—1984 c 258: "This act may be known and cited as the court improvement act of 1984." [ 1984 c 258 s 1.]

Savings—1967 ex.s. c 42: "All matters relating to functions transferred under the provisions of this 1967 amendatory act which at the time of transfer have not been completed may be undertaken and completed by the director of the planning and community affairs agency, who is authorized, empowered, and directed to promulgate any and all orders, rules and regulations necessary to accomplish this purpose." [ 1967 ex.s. c 42 s 4.] The planning and community affairs agency has been redesignated the department of community, trade, and economic development. See RCW 43.330.020. The department of community, trade, and economic development has been renamed the department of commerce by 2009 c 565.

Effective date—1967 ex.s. c 42: "This 1967 amendatory act shall take effect on July 1, 1967." [ 1967 ex.s. c 42 s 5.]

Population determinations, office of financial management: Chapter 43.62 RCW.